Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.90.040

Computer trespass in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of computer trespass in the first degree if the person, without authorization, intentionally gains access to a computer system or electronic database of another; and

(a) The access is made with the intent to commit another crime in violation of a state law not included in this chapter; or

(b) The violation involves a computer or database maintained by a government agency.

(2) Computer trespass in the first degree is a class C felony.

[ 2016 c 164 s 4.]